dicts/cop_EG/cop_EG.aff
PFX p 0 ⲁϥϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙⲑ̀ⲣⲉϥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲥϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲁⲛϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁ ϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲩϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_3PPL

#------------------------------------------
# Pronomial SUFIXES  
#
#------------------------------------------
# accusative pronouns, simplified!
̀# I have observed that "ⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ" has a special treatement:
# since it (also?) follows status constructus/nominalis (-), it should
# be written separatley and not joined
 
SFX s Y 32
SFX s 0 ⲓ [ⲟⲱ] ACC_1PSG
SFX s 0 ⲏⲓ [ⲛ]
SFX s ⲧⲉ ϯ ⲧⲉ
SFX s 0 ⲟⲓ [ⲣ] ACC_1PSG
SFX s 0 ⲧ [^ⲟⲱ] ACC_1PSG
SFX s 0 ⲉⲧ [ⲃⲙ] ACC_1PSG
SFX s 0 ⲏⲧ ϧⲟⲑⲃ
SFX s 0 ⲛ [ⲁⲉⲓⲏⲟⲱ] ACC_1PPL
SFX s 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . ACC_1PPL
SFX s 0 ⲉⲛ [^ⲁⲉⲓⲏⲟⲱ] ACC_1PPL
SFX s 0 ⲕ/E . ACC_2PSGM
SFX s 0 ⲁⲕ [ⲛ]
SFX s 0 ⲉⲕ [ⲃⲙ]
SFX s 0 ⲥ . ACC_2PSGF
SFX s 0 ⲉⲥ [ⲃⲙ] ACC_2PSGF
SFX s 0 ⲉ .
SFX s 0 ⲓ [^ⲟⲱ] ACC_2PSGF
SFX s 0 ϯ [^ⲟⲱⲧ] ACC_2PSGF
SFX s ⲧ ϯ [ⲧ] ACC_2PSGF
SFX s ⲟ ⲱⲧⲉⲛ [ⲟ] ACC_2PPL
SFX s 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . ACC_2PPL
̀SFX s 0 ⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . ACC_2PPL
SFX s 0 ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ [ⲧ] 
SFX s 0 ϥ/E . ACC_3PSGM
SFX s ⲉ ⲁϥ/E [ⲉ] ACC_3PSGM
SFX s 0 ⲉϥ/E [ⲃⲙ] ACC_3PSGM
SFX s 0 ⲥ . ACC_3PSGF
SFX s 0 ⲩ ⲁ ACC_3PPL
SFX s 0 ⲧⲟⲩ [ⲓ1ⲟⲛ] ACC_3PPL
SFX s ⲟ ⲱⲟⲩ [ⲟ] ACC_3PPL
SFX s 0 ⲱⲟⲩ [ⲃⲛ] ACC_3PPL
SFX s 0 ⲟⲩ [^ⲓⲟ] ACC_3PPL

########## pronomial verbs, special cases  ###########

#dec. for ⲁⲓ⸗ (make) (88)
SFX m Y 8
SFX m 0 ⲧ . 1PSG
SFX m 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX m 0 ϯ . 2PSGF
SFX m 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX m 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX m 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX m 0 ⲧⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . 2PPL
SFX m 0 ⲧⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# ⲧⲱⲛ⸗ (raise carry, (166)
̀# sometimes: ⲧⲱⲟⲩⲛ⸗ (irregular)
SFX n Y 9
SFX n 0 ⲧ . 1PSG
SFX n 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX n 0 ϯ . 2PSGF
SFX n ⲛ ⲟⲩⲛ . 2PSGF
SFX n 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX n 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX n 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX n ⲱⲛ ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . 2PPL
SFX n ⲛ ⲟⲩⲛⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# ⲟⲩⲟⲛⲧ⸗ لدى
# ⲙ̀ⲙⲟⲛⲧ⸗
SFX o Y 15
SFX o 0 ⲏⲓ . 1PSG
SFX o ⲧ ϯ ⲧ 
SFX o 0 ⲁⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX o 0 ⲉⲕ . 
SFX o 0 ⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX o 0 ⲁϥ . 3PSGM
SFX o 0 ⲉϥ . 
SFX o 0 ⲁⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX o 0 ⲉⲥ . 
SFX o 0 ⲁⲛ . 1PPL
SFX o 0 ⲉⲛ . 
SFX o 0 ⲱⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX o 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛ . 
SFX o 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL
SFX o 0 ⲱⲟⲩ . 

#  ...ⲙⲉⲩⲓ
PFX f Y 9
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡ̀ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲁ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲉⲕ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲉϥ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲉⲥ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲟⲩ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲉ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲉⲛ .
PFX f 0 ⲉⲣⲡⲉⲧⲉⲛ .


# special case : ⲉϩⲛⲁ⸗ a (will, desire)(462)
# maybe ⲡⲉϫ⸗ ? (noticed: ⲡⲉϫⲁϥ, ⲡⲉϫⲁⲥ,  ⲡⲉϫⲉ so far)
SFX k Y 8
SFX k 0 ⲏⲓ . 1PSG
SFX k 0 ⲁⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX k 0 ⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX k 0 ⲁϥ . 3PSGM
SFX k 0 ⲁⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX k 0 ⲁⲛ . 1PPL
SFX k 0 ⲱⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX k 0 ⲱⲟⲩ . 3PPL


############### pronouns / prepositions ################

#dec. for ⲧⲏⲣ⸗ (all) (93)
SFX a Y 7
SFX a 0 ⲧ . 1PSG
SFX a 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX a 0 ⲓ . 2PSGF
SFX a 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX a 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX a 0 ⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX a 0 ⲟⲩ . 2PPL/3PPL

# ⲉⲑⲣ⸗ (so that, that, for) (95)
SFX b Y 8
SFX b 0 ⲓ . 1PSG
SFX b 0 ⲉⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX b 0 ⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX b 0 ⲉϥ . 3PSGM
SFX b 0 ⲉⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX b 0 ⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX b 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX b 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# ϩⲱⲕ (also) (327)
SFX c Y 7
SFX c 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX c 0 ⲓ . 2PSGF
SFX c 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX c 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX c 0 ⲛ . 1PPL
SFX c 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX c 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# ⲛ̀ⲥⲱ⸗ (after, behind) (250)
#  ⲙⲉⲛⲉⲛⲥⲱ⸗ (after this) (306)
SFX d Y 8
SFX d 0 ⲓ . 1PSG
SFX d 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX d ⲧ ϯ . 2PSGF
SFX d 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX d 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX d 0 ⲛ . 1PPL
SFX d 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX d 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# possesive pronoun (mine, yours..) (209):
# ϥⲁ, ϥⲱ⸗ (masc.)
# ⲑⲁ, ⲑⲱ⸗ (masc.)
# ⲛⲁ, ⲛⲟⲩ⸗ (pl.)
# ⲫⲱ ?
SFX e Y 8
SFX e 0 ⲓ . 1PSG
SFX e 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX e 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX e 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX e 0 ⲛ . 1PPL
SFX e 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX e 0 ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . (only ⲫⲱ?)
SFX e 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL

#for ⲙ̀ⲙ⸗ⲟⲓ, ϩⲁⲣ⸗ⲟⲓ, ⲉⲣ⸗ⲟⲓ, ⲉϩⲟⲧⲉⲣ⸗
SFX h Y 8
SFX h 0 ⲟⲓ . 1PSG
SFX h 0 ⲟⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX h 0 ⲟ . 2PSGF
SFX h 0 ⲟϥ . 3PSGM 
SFX h 0 ⲟⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX h 0 ⲟⲛ . 1PPL
SFX h 0 ⲱⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX h 0 ⲱⲟⲩ . 3PPL

#  ⲟⲩⲃⲏ⸗ (opposite, toward, agianst) (452)
SFX u Y 7
SFX u 0 ⲓ . 1PSG
SFX u 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX u 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX u 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX u 0 ⲛ . 1PPL
SFX u 0 ⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . 2PPL
SFX u 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL

#  ⲛⲁⲛ⸗ (great) (399)
SFX v Y 8
SFX v 0 ⲏⲓ . 1PSG
SFX v 0 ⲉⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX v 0 ⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX v 0 ⲉϥ . 3PSGM
SFX v 0 ⲉⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX v 0 ⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX v 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX v 0 ⲉⲩ . 3PPL

# pronouns: ⲛⲉⲙ (with), ⲛⲁ (=to)
SFX x Y 8
SFX x 0 ⲏⲓ . 1PSG
SFX x 0 ⲁⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX x 0 ⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX x 0 ⲁϥ . 3PSGM
SFX x 0 ⲁⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX x 0 ⲁⲛ . 1PPL
SFX x 0 ⲱⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX x 0 ⲱⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# pronoun ϧⲉⲛ --> ⲛ̀ϧⲏⲧ⸗ (in, by) (54)
# but 2PPL is not valid for ⲛ̀ϧⲏⲧ⸗
# also ⲙ̀ⲙⲁⲩⲁⲧ⸗ (342), ⲁⲣⲓⲧ⸗ (do, make)(88)
SFX y Y 7
SFX y 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX y ⲧ ϯ . 2PSGF
SFX y 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX y 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX y 0 ⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX y 0 ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ [^ⲏ]ⲧ 2PPL
SFX y 0 ⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# pronouns 	ϩ̀ⲣⲁ⸗ (=to)(23),
#  		ⲉ̀ϩ̀ⲣⲁ⸗ (towards),
#		ⲛⲁϩⲣ⸗ (in front) (202)
SFX z Y 10
SFX z 0 ⲏⲓ . 1PSG
SFX z 0 ⲁⲓ . 1PSG
SFX z 0 ⲁⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX z 0 ⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX z 0 ⲁϥ . 3PSGM
SFX z 0 ⲁⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX z 0 ⲁⲛ . 1PPL
SFX z 0 ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . 2PPL
SFX z 0 ⲉⲛ . 
SFX z 0 ⲁⲩ . 3PPL

# for ϩⲓϫ-ⲉⲛ (onto)(24) 
# ϫⲱ⸗
SFX w Y 10
SFX w 0 ⲉⲛ . 
SFX w 0 ⲱⲓ . 1PSG
SFX w 0 ⲱⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX w 0 ⲱⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX w 0 ⲱϥ . 3PSGM
SFX w 0 ⲱⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX w 0 ⲱⲛ . 1PPL
SFX w 0 ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . 2PPL
SFX w 0 ⲱⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX w 0 ⲱⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# ϩⲓⲧ-ⲉⲛ (by, with)
SFX t Y 9
SFX t 0 ⲉⲛ . 
SFX t 0 ⲟⲧ . 1PSG
SFX t 0 ⲟⲧⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX t 0 ⲟϯ . 2PSGF
SFX t 0 ⲟⲧϥ . 3PSGM
SFX t 0 ⲟⲧⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX t 0 ⲟⲧⲉⲛ . 1PPL
SFX t 0 ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ . 2PPL
SFX t 0 ⲟⲧⲟⲩ . 3PPL

# ⲉⲧ-ⲉⲣⲉ
SFX r Y 8
SFX r 0 ⲓ . 1PSG
SFX r 0 ⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX r 0 ⲣⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX r 0 ϥ . 3PSGM
SFX r 0 ⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX r 0 ⲛ . 1PPL
SFX r 0 ⲉⲩ . 2PPL
SFX r 0 ⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ . 3PPL

# special case: ⲣⲁⲧ= (foot) (201)
# also ⲓⲁⲧ⸗ (sight) (602)
# - possessive pronouns
#
SFX R Y 8
SFX R 0 ⲕ/E . 2PSGM
SFX R 0 ϯ/E . 2PSGF
SFX R 0 ϥ/E . 3PSGM
SFX R 0 ⲥ/E . 3PSGF
SFX R 0 ⲉⲛ/E . 1PPL
SFX R 0 ⲉⲛⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ/E . 2PPL 
SFX R 0 ⲑⲏⲛⲟⲩ/E . 2PPL 
SFX R 0 ⲟⲩ/E . 3PPL

# special case: ϣⲉ⸗ (go)
SFX q Y 8
SFX q 0 ⲛⲏⲓ . 1PSG
SFX q 0 ⲛⲁⲕ . 2PSGM
SFX q 0 ⲛⲉ . 2PSGF
SFX q 0 ⲛⲁϥ . 3PSGM
SFX q 0 ⲛⲁⲥ . 3PSGF
SFX q 0 ⲛⲁⲛ . 1PPL
SFX q 0 ⲛⲱⲧⲉⲛ . 2PPL
SFX q 0 ⲛⲱⲟⲩ . 3PPL
